Utah statutes.
59-10-201.1.   State taxable income of a resident estate or trust defined.
For a taxable year, the state taxable income of a resident estate or trust
means the unadjusted income of the resident estate or trust for that taxable
year, as adjusted by Sections 59-10-202, 59-10-209.1, and 59-10-210.
